California, session 20252026, SB914.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 41020.3 of the Education Code is amended to read:41020.3. (a) By March 31 of each year, or Within 45 days after the issuance of an audit report, whichever is later, the governing board or body of each local educational agency shall review, at a public meeting, the annual audit of the local educational agency for the prior year, any audit exceptions identified in that audit, the recommendations or findings of any management letter issued by the auditor, and any description of correction or plans to correct any exceptions or management letter issue. This review(b) The review in subdivision (a) shall be placed on the agenda of the meeting pursuant to Section 35145. 35145 or 47604.1, as applicable. The action of the governing board or body of the local educational agency shall be to accept or reject the annual audit report.(b)During the 2021–22 fiscal year, the annual audit for the 2020–21 fiscal year and its relevant components, as identified pursuant to subdivision (a), shall instead be reviewed by February 28, 2022.(c) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, educational joint powers authority, county superintendent of schools, or charter school.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.